Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1544
Director; rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act.

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 26.